Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 10 Retirement System — Contributions and Benefits
36-10-19.
Persons eligible for optional benefits — Time of election — Modification or revocation — Effective date.

The optional provisions of §

36-10-18

shall be applicable only to a member applying for a service retirement allowance, an accidental disability retirement allowance, and an ordinary disability retirement allowance or any inactive member applying for retirement under vested rights. The election under option 1 or 2 of §

36-10-18(a)

shall be made at the time of retirement of the member as part of his or her application for a retirement allowance. The election shall be based upon the amount of retirement allowances that may accrue at the date of death of the member and may be revoked or modified by the member at any time after retirement on a form prescribed by the retirement board, provided that, during this time, the named beneficiary has not been divorced from the member. The option, in the case of death of a retired member, shall become effective on the next day following the death of the member and payment of benefits thereunder shall be made in accordance with the provisions hereof, subject to the limitations prescribed in §

36-10-18

. This section shall not apply to any one who elects the social security supplemental option as provided by §

36-10-10.3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 9; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 8; P.L. 1949, ch. 2377, § 3; P.L. 1951, ch. 2747, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2830, § 4; P.L. 1953, ch. 3180, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3370, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3610, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-21

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 60, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 112, art. 5, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 384, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 542, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 511, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 233, § 1.

36-10-19.1.
Optional annuity protection — In service.

Upon the death of a member having: (1) At least ten (10) years of membership service on or before June 30, 2012; or (2) For active contributing members on or after July 1, 2012, at least five (5) years of membership service, the spouse or domestic partner of the member shall have the option to elect to receive option one as provided in §

36-10-18(a)

in lieu of a return of contributions, provided the spouse or domestic partner is the designated beneficiary of the member’s retirement account. The election shall be based upon the amount of retirement allowance or actuarial equivalent that may accrue at the date of death of the member.

The election under option one of §

36-10-18(a)

for a person other than the spouse or domestic partner of the member may be made by the member, while in service, provided the member has (1) At least ten (10) years of membership service on or before June 30, 2012, and before retirement; or (2) For active contributing members on or after July 1, 2012, at least five (5) years of membership service and before retirement, on a form prescribed by the retirement board. The election shall be based upon the amount of retirement allowances or actuarial equivalents that may accrue at the date of death of the member, provided that the election form is executed and filed with the retirement board prior to the date of death. The election may be revoked or modified by the member at any time prior to the date of retirement on a form prescribed by the retirement board.

Upon the death of a member, the option shall become effective thirty (30) days after the first day of the calendar month next following the date of death of the member if death occurs while in an employee status. Should death occur while in an inactive member status, the option under this section shall become payable on the first of the month next succeeding that in which the designated beneficiary attains the age of sixty (60) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 511, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 547, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 510, § 11; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 7; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 7.

36-10-20.
Accidental death benefits.

Upon the accidental death of a member while in service before retirement, provided that evidence shall be submitted to the retirement board proving that the death of the member was the natural and proximate result of an accident while in the performance of duty at some definite time and place, and that the death was not the result of willful negligence on his or her part, his or her accumulated contributions, including interest on all contributions to the date of death of the member, shall be paid to the person having an insurable interest in his or her life as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the retirement board, or if the member has filed no nomination or if the person so nominated shall have died, then to the estate of the deceased member, and upon application by or on behalf of the dependents of the deceased member the retirement board shall grant a benefit equal to one-half (1/2) of the rate of annual compensation of the member at date of death:

To the member’s widow or widower or domestic partner for life unless he or she remarries or enters into a domestic partnership;

If there be no widow, or widower or domestic partner or if the widow or widower or domestic partner dies or remarries or enters into a domestic partnership before any child of the deceased member shall have attained the age of eighteen (18) years, then to the member’s child or children under the age of eighteen (18) years, divided in such manner as the retirement board in its discretion shall determine, to continue as a joint and survivor annuity equal to one-half (1/2) of the member’s rate of annual compensation at the date of death until every child dies or attains the age of eighteen (18) years; or

If there be no widow or widower or domestic partner or child under the age of eighteen (18) years surviving the deceased member, then to his or her dependent father or mother as the deceased member shall have nominated by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the retirement board; or, if there be no nomination, then to his or her dependent father or to his or her dependent mother as the retirement board in its discretion shall direct, to continue for life.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 9; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 7; P.L. 1949, ch. 2377, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-20

; P.L. 1984, ch. 426, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 510, § 11.

36-10-21.
Ordinary death benefit.

Upon the death of a member before retirement from any cause other than one compensable under §

36-10-20

, a payment shall be made of the contributions of the member without interest. If the death of a member occurred while in an employee status, or while on an official leave of absence for illness from his or her position which had not extended at the date of death for a continuous period in excess of one year, a death benefit shall be paid which shall be equal to eight hundred dollars ($800) for each completed year of total service subject to a minimum payment of four thousand dollars ($4,000) and a maximum payment of sixteen thousand dollars ($16,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 9; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 8; P.L. 1949, ch. 2377, § 3; P.L. 1951, ch. 2747, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2830, § 4; P.L. 1953, ch. 3180, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3370, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3610, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-21

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 60, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 112, art. 5, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 395, § 1.

36-10-22.
Retention of death benefit coverage by general assembly member not reelected.

If any present or former member of the general assembly who is a member of the system, who is not reelected, desires to retain his or her ordinary death benefit insurance coverage, he or she shall be allowed to do so providing that he or she pays an annual contribution of fifteen dollars ($15.00) per year for each year the insurance is carried by the member or former member of the general assembly.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 9; P.L. 1951, ch. 2747, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3180, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3370, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-22

.

36-10-23.
Benefit payable on death after retirement.

Upon the death of a member after retirement, unless the member shall have selected any of the options provided in §

36-10-18

, a benefit shall be payable consisting of the excess, if any, of the total contributions of the member at date of retirement, without interest, over the aggregate amount of all retirement allowance payments received by the member prior to his or her death.

In addition, a benefit shall be payable upon the death of any retired member, regardless of date of retirement, consisting of the continuation of the ordinary death benefit provisions of the retirement act into retirement in the full amount, accrued at the date of retirement, for the first year subsequent to the date of retirement, provided also that in each succeeding year thereafter this amount shall be reduced on each retirement anniversary date by twenty-five percent (25%) until twenty-five percent (25%) of the total amount accumulated as of the date of retirement has been reached, provided, however, that the amount shall not be reduced to less than four thousand dollars ($4,000). This sum shall be continued thereafter as the sum payable on death after retirement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 109, § 2; P.L. 1982, ch. 193, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 395, § 1.

36-10-23.1.
Benefit payable on death of retired legislator.

In addition to any service retirement allowance paid to any person who shall have served as a member of the senate or of the house of representatives pursuant to §

36-10-10

, there shall be payable, in lieu of the benefit payable on death after retirement as provided by §

36-10-23

, the ordinary death benefit provided in §

36-10-21

, P.L. 1960, ch. 132, to be paid upon the death of a member occurring while in an employee status before retirement, notwithstanding the death of the former member of the general assembly in fact occurs after retirement, provided the former member of the general assembly had retained his or her ordinary death benefit insurance coverage by paying the annual contribution provided in §

36-10-22

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 152, § 1.

36-10-24.
Person to whom death benefit payable.

The payment of contributions of the member and the death benefit to a member or retired member under the provisions of §§

36-10-21

—

36-10-23

shall be made to such person as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the retirement board, or if the member has filed no nomination, or if the person so nominated has died, then to the estate of the deceased member.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 9; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 8; P.L. 1949, ch. 2377, § 3; P.L. 1951, ch. 2747, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2830, § 4; P.L. 1953, ch. 3180, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3370, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3558, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-24

.

36-10-25 — 36-10-30.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 669, § 1; P.L. 1940, ch. 925, §§ 1— 4; P.L. 1941, ch. 1045, § 2; P.L. 1946, ch. 1762, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3017, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

36-10-25

— 36-10-30; Repealed by P.L. 1980, ch. 170, § 2 and P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 1, § 6.

36-10-31.
Deduction of amounts received from workers’ compensation or as damages.

Any amount paid or payable under the provisions of any workers’ compensation law exclusive of Medicare set-aside allocations, specific compensation benefits or any benefits authorized by the terms of a collective bargaining agreement or as the result of any action for damages for personal injuries against the state of Rhode Island on account of the death or disability of a member shall be offset against and payable in lieu of any benefits payable out of funds provided by the state under the provisions of this chapter on account of the death or disability of the member. If the value of the total commuted benefits under any workers’ compensation law or action is less than the present value on an actuarial basis of the benefits otherwise payable under this chapter, the value of the commuted payments shall be deducted from the present value of the benefits and the balance thereof shall be payable under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 11; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-31

; P.L. 2014, ch. 231, § 5; P.L. 2014, ch. 289, § 5.

36-10-32.
Tax exemption.

The right of a member or beneficiary to a pension, an annuity, a retirement allowance, to the return of contributions, any benefit, or right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of chapters 8 — 10 of this title, and the money in the various funds created hereunder, are hereby made exempt from any municipal tax or state tax except for the personal income tax imposed under the provisions of chapter 30 of title 44.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-32

; P.L. 1985, ch. 496, art. 3, § 1.

Legislative Intent.

Sections 2 and 3 of P.L. 1985, ch. 496, art. III contain legislative findings and intent regarding the purpose and severability of the 1985 amendment to this section by that Act.

36-10-33.
Penalty for fraudulent claim or statement.

Every person who knowingly or willfully makes, presents, or in anyway procures the making or presentation of any false or fraudulent affidavit or affirmation concerning any claim for pension or payment thereof, shall, in every case, forfeit a sum not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), in addition to the repayment of any and all money received from the retirement system because of a false or fraudulent claim or statement, with interest, at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per annum, to be sued and recovered by and in the name of the retirement board of the retirement system, and when recovered, paid over to and thereupon become a part of the funds of the retirement system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-33

; P.L. 1980, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 7; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 7.

36-10-34.
Exemption of benefits and contributions from attachment.

Any and all retirement benefits and contributions in the state employees’ and municipal employees’ retirement systems shall be exempt from lien, attachment, or garnishment and shall not be transferable or assignable; provided, however, that any governmental agency which may have a claim on money due from one of its employees related to his or her employment in the agency shall have the right to the payment at the time any refund of contributions is made to the member.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 168, § 1.

36-10-35.
Additional benefits payable to retired employees.

All state employees and all beneficiaries of state employees receiving any service retirement or ordinary or accidental disability retirement allowance pursuant to the provisions of this title on or before December 31, 1967, shall receive a cost of living retirement adjustment equal to one and one-half percent (1.5%) per year of the original retirement allowance, not compounded, for each calendar year the retirement allowance has been in effect. For the purposes of computation, credit shall be given for a full calendar year regardless of the effective date of the retirement allowance. This cost of living adjustment shall be added to the amount of the retirement allowance as of January 1, 1968, and an additional one and one-half percent (1.5%) shall be added to the original retirement allowance in each succeeding year during the month of January, and provided further, that this additional cost of living increase shall be three percent (3%) for the year beginning January 1, 1971, and each year thereafter, through December 31, 1980. Notwithstanding any of the above provisions, no employee receiving any service retirement allowance pursuant to the provisions of this title on or before December 31, 1967, or the employee’s beneficiary, shall receive any additional benefit hereunder in an amount less than two hundred dollars ($200) per year over the service retirement allowance where the employee retired prior to January 1, 1958.

All state employees and all beneficiaries of state employees retired on or after January 1, 1968, who are receiving any service retirement or ordinary or accidental disability retirement allowance pursuant to the provisions of this title shall, on the first day of January next following the third anniversary date of the retirement, receive a cost of living retirement adjustment, in addition to his or her retirement allowance, in an amount equal to three percent (3%) of the original retirement allowance. In each succeeding year thereafter through December 31, 1980, during the month of January, the retirement allowance shall be increased an additional three percent (3%) of the original retirement allowance, not compounded, to be continued during the lifetime of the employee or beneficiary. For the purposes of computation, credit shall be given for a full calendar year regardless of the effective date of the service retirement allowance.

Beginning on January 1, 1981, for all state employees and beneficiaries of the state employees receiving any service retirement and all state employees, and all beneficiaries of state employees, who have completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, and for all state employees, and all beneficiaries of state employees who receive a disability retirement allowance pursuant to §§

36-10-12

—

36-10-15

, the cost of living adjustment shall be computed and paid at the rate of three percent (3%) of the original retirement allowance or the retirement allowance as computed in accordance with §

36-10-35.1

, compounded annually from the year for which the cost of living adjustment was determined to be payable by the retirement board pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) or (b) of this section. Such cost of living adjustments are available to members who retire before October 1, 2009, or are eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009.

The provisions of this subsection shall be deemed to apply prospectively only and no retroactive payment shall be made.

The retirement allowance of all state employees and all beneficiaries of state employees who have not completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, or were not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, shall, on the month following the third anniversary date of retirement, and on the month following the anniversary date of each succeeding year be adjusted and computed by multiplying the retirement allowance by three percent (3%) or the percentage of increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year, whichever is less; the cost of living adjustment shall be compounded annually from the year for which the cost of living adjustment was determined payable by the retirement board; provided, that no adjustment shall cause any retirement allowance to be decreased from the retirement allowance provided immediately before such adjustment.

For state employees not eligible to retire in accordance with this chapter as of September 30, 2009, and not eligible upon passage of this article, and for their beneficiaries, the cost of living adjustment described in subsection (c)(3) of this section shall only apply to the first thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) of retirement allowance, indexed annually, and shall commence upon the third (3rd) anniversary of the date of retirement or when the retiree reaches age sixty-five (65), whichever is later. The thirty-five thousand dollar ($35,000) limit shall increase annually by the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year or three percent (3%), whichever is less. The first thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) of retirement allowance, as indexed, shall be multiplied by the percentage of increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year or three percent (3%), whichever is less, on the month following the anniversary date of each succeeding year. For state employees eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, or eligible upon passage of this article, and for their beneficiaries, the provisions of this subsection (d) shall not apply.

All legislators and all beneficiaries of legislators who are receiving a retirement allowance pursuant to the provisions of §

36-10-9.1

for a period of three (3) or more years, shall, commencing January 1, 1982, receive a cost of living retirement adjustment, in addition to a retirement allowance, in an amount equal to three percent (3%) of the original retirement allowance. In each succeeding year thereafter during the month of January, the retirement allowance shall be increased an additional three percent (3%) of the original retirement allowance, compounded annually, to be continued during the lifetime of the legislator or beneficiary. For the purposes of computation, credit shall be given for a full calendar year regardless of the effective date of the service retirement allowance.

The provisions of §§

45-13-7

—

45-13-10

shall not apply to this section.

This subsection (g) shall be effective for the period July 1, 2012, through June 30, 2015.

Notwithstanding the prior paragraphs of this section, and subject to paragraph (g)(2) below, for all present and former employees, active and retired members, and beneficiaries receiving any retirement, disability or death allowance or benefit of any kind, the annual benefit adjustment provided in any calendar year under this section shall be equal to (A) multiplied by (B) where (A) is equal to the percentage determined by subtracting five and one-half percent (5.5%) (the “subtrahend”) from the Five-Year Average Investment Return of the retirement system determined as of the last day of the plan year preceding the calendar year in which the adjustment is granted, said percentage not to exceed four percent (4%) and not to be less than zero percent (0%), and (B) is equal to the lesser of the member’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of retirement allowance, such twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) amount to be indexed annually in the same percentage as determined under (g)(1)(A) above. The “Five-Year Average Investment Return” shall mean the average of the investment returns of the most recent five (5) plan years as determined by the retirement board. Subject to paragraph (g)(2) below, the benefit adjustment provided by this paragraph shall commence upon the third (3rd) anniversary of the date of retirement or the date on which the retiree reaches his or her Social Security retirement age, whichever is later. In the event the retirement board adjusts the actuarially assumed rate of return for the system, either upward or downward, the subtrahend shall be adjusted either upward or downward in the same amount.

Except as provided in paragraph (g)(3), the benefit adjustments under this section for any plan year shall be suspended in their entirety unless the Funded Ratio of the Employees’ Retirement System of Rhode Island, the Judicial Retirement Benefits Trust and the State Police Retirement Benefits Trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%) in which event the benefit adjustment will be reinstated for all members for such plan year.

In determining whether a funding level under this paragraph (g)(2) has been achieved, the actuary shall calculate the funding percentage after taking into account the reinstatement of any current or future benefit adjustment provided under this section.

Notwithstanding paragraph (g)(2), in each fifth plan year commencing after June 30, 2012, commencing with the plan year ending June 30, 2017, and subsequently at intervals of five plan years, a benefit adjustment shall be calculated and made in accordance with paragraph (g)(1) above until the Funded Ratio of the Employees’ Retirement System of Rhode Island, the Judicial Retirement Benefits Trust and the State Police Retirement Benefits Trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%).

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the provisions of this paragraph (g) shall become effective July 1, 2012, and shall apply to any benefit adjustment not granted on or prior to June 30, 2012.

This subsection (h) shall become effective July 1, 2015.

As soon as administratively reasonable following the enactment into law of this subsection (h), a one-time benefit adjustment shall be provided to members and/or beneficiaries of members who retired on or before June 30, 2012, in the amount of 2% of the lesser of either the member’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of the member’s retirement allowance. This one-time benefit adjustment shall be provided without regard to the retiree’s age or number of years since retirement.

Notwithstanding the prior subsections of this section, for all present and former employees, active and retired members, and beneficiaries receiving any retirement, disability or death allowance or benefit of any kind, the annual benefit adjustment provided in any calendar year under this section for adjustments on and after January 1, 2016, and subject to subsection (h)(2) below, shall be equal to (I) multiplied by (II):

Shall equal the sum of fifty percent (50%) of (i) plus fifty percent (50%) of (ii) where:

Is equal to the percentage determined by subtracting five and one-half percent (5.5%) (the “subtrahend”) from the five-year average investment return of the retirement system determined as of the last day of the plan year preceding the calendar year in which the adjustment is granted, said percentage not to exceed four percent (4%) and not to be less than zero percent (0%). The “five-year average investment return” shall mean the average of the investment returns of the most recent five (5) plan years as determined by the retirement board. In the event the retirement board adjusts the actuarially assumed rate of return for the system, either upward or downward, the subtrahend shall be adjusted either upward or downward in the same amount.

Is equal to the lesser of three percent (3%) or the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the U.S. Department of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year. In no event shall the sum of (i) plus (ii) exceed three and one-half percent (3.5%) or be less than zero percent (0%).

(II)

Is equal to the lesser of either the member’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five thousand eight hundred and fifty-five dollars ($25,855) of retirement allowance, such amount to be indexed annually in the same percentage as determined under subsection (h)(1)(B)(I) above.

The benefit adjustments provided by this subsection (h)(1)(B) shall be provided to all retirees entitled to receive a benefit adjustment as of June 30, 2012, under the law then in effect, and for all other retirees the benefit adjustments shall commence upon the third anniversary of the date of retirement or the date on which the retiree reaches his or her Social Security retirement age, whichever is later.

Except as provided in subsection (h)(3) of this section, the benefit adjustments under subsection (h)(1)(B) for any plan year shall be suspended in their entirety unless the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%) in which event the benefit adjustment will be reinstated for all members for such plan year.

In determining whether a funding level under this subsection (h)(2) has been achieved, the actuary shall calculate the funding percentage after taking into account the reinstatement of any current or future benefit adjustment provided under this section.

Notwithstanding subsection (h)(2), in each fourth plan year commencing after June 30, 2012, commencing with the plan year ending June 30, 2016, and subsequently at intervals of four plan years:

A benefit adjustment shall be calculated and made in accordance with subsection (h)(1)(B) above; and

Effective for members and/or beneficiaries of members who retired on or before June 30, 2015, the dollar amount in subsection (h)(1)(B)(II) of twenty-five thousand eight hundred and fifty-five dollars ($25,855) shall be replaced with thirty-one thousand and twenty-six dollars ($31,026) until the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%).

Effective for members and/or beneficiaries of members who have retired on or before July 1, 2015, a one-time stipend of five hundred dollars ($500) shall be payable within sixty (60) days following the enactment of the legislation implementing this provision, and a second one-time stipend of five hundred dollars ($500) in the same month of the following year. These stipends shall be payable to all retired members or beneficiaries receiving a benefit as of the applicable payment date and shall not be considered cost of living adjustments under the prior provisions of this section.

History of Section.

G.L., §

36-10-35

; P.L. 1968, ch 231, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 112, art. 10, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 237, §§ 2, 3; P.L. 1981, ch. 120, § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 362, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 482, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 352, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 7, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 7; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 7; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 21, § 7; P.L. 2021, ch. 395, § 9, effective July 14, 2021.

36-10-35.1.
One time adjustment to original retirement allowances.

All state employees and the beneficiaries of state employees who retired during calendar year 1979 shall receive an additional eight percent (8%) to their original retirement allowances.

All state employees and the beneficiaries of state employees who retired during calendar year 1979 shall receive an additional two percent (2%) added to the base eight percent (8%) paid to the 1979 retirees. Provided, further, that an additional two percent (2%) of the retirement allowance shall be paid for each year to a maximum of twenty percent (20%) to those retirees and beneficiaries who retired in calendar year 1973, and prior to 1973, as indicated in the following schedule:

The additional percentage shall be incorporated into the recipient’s monthly benefit starting with the payment due on or after July 31, 1986. Provided further, that the new 1986 pro rated payment shall be the base for any subsequent cost of living adjustment payments.

The provisions of §§

45-13-7

—

45-13-10

shall not apply to this section.

Year of Retirement Additional Percentage 1979 8% 1978 10% 1977 12% 1976 14% 1975 16% 1974 18% 1973 20% Years prior to 1973 20%

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 482, § 4.